Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-334
Act, how cited.

Sections 45-334 to 45-380 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act.

Laws 1965, c. 268, § 1, p. 756;

Laws 1994, LB 979, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 31;

Laws 2012, LB965, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB778, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 55.

Installment Sales Act of 1965 sustained as constitutional. Engelmeyer v. Murphy, 180 Neb. 295, 142 N.W.2d 342 (1966).